Nevada, session 83, AB545.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 445B.830 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
445B.830 1. In areas of the State where and when a program
is commenced pursuant to NRS 445B.770 to 445B.815, inclusive,
the following fees must be paid to the Department of Motor
Vehicles and accounted for in the Pollution Control Account, which
is hereby created in the State General Fund:
(a) For the issuance and annual renewal of a license
for an authorized inspection station, authorized station
or fleet station ............................................................................... $25
(b) For each set of 25 forms certifying emission
control compliance ............................................................... [150] 175
(c) For each form issued to a fleet station .............................. [6] 7
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, and after
deduction of the amounts distributed pursuant to subsections 4 and
7, money in the Pollution Control Account may, pursuant to
legislative appropriation or with the approval of the Interim Finance
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
Committee, be expended by the following agencies in the following
order of priority:
(a) The Department of Motor Vehicles to carry out the
provisions of NRS 445B.770 to 445B.845, inclusive.
(b) The State Department of Conservation and Natural
Resources to carry out the provisions of this chapter.
(c) The State Department of Agriculture to carry out the
provisions of NRS 590.010 to 590.150, inclusive.
(d) Local air pollution control agencies in nonattainment or
maintenance areas for an air pollutant for which air quality criteria
have been issued pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 7408, for programs related
to the improvement of the quality of the air.
(e) The Tahoe Regional Planning Agency to carry out the
provisions of NRS 277.200 with respect to the preservation and
improvement of air quality in the Lake Tahoe Basin.
3. The Department of Motor Vehicles may prescribe by
regulation routine fees for inspection at the prevailing shop labor
rate, including, without limitation, maximum charges for those fees,
and for the posting of those fees in a conspicuous place at an
authorized inspection station or authorized station.
4. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall make quarterly
distributions of money in the Pollution Control Account to local air
pollution control agencies in nonattainment or maintenance areas for
an air pollutant for which air quality criteria have been issued
pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 7408. The distributions of money made to
agencies in a county pursuant to this subsection must be made from
an amount of money in the Pollution Control Account that is equal
to one-sixth of the amount received for each form issued in the
county pursuant to subsection 1.
5. Each local air pollution control agency that receives money
pursuant to subsections 4, 6 and 7 shall, not later than 45 days after
the end of the fiscal year in which the money is received, submit to
the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the
Interim Finance Committee a report on the use of the money
received.
6. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall make annual
distributions of excess money in the Pollution Control Account to
local air pollution control agencies in nonattainment or maintenance
areas for an air pollutant for which air quality criteria have been
issued pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 7408, for programs related to the
improvement of the quality of the air. The distributions of excess
money made to local air pollution control agencies in a county
pursuant to this subsection must be made in an amount
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
proportionate to the number of forms issued in the county pursuant
to subsection 1. As used in this subsection, “excess money” means
the money in excess of $1,000,000 remaining in the Pollution
Control Account at the end of the fiscal year, after deduction of the
amounts distributed pursuant to subsections 4 and 7 and any
disbursements made from the Account pursuant to subsection 2.
7. If a board of county commissioners imposes an additional
fee pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 445B.834, the Department of
Motor Vehicles shall:
(a) Upon receiving the notification pursuant to subsection 2 of
NRS 445B.834, collect the additional fee on behalf of the county
and account separately for money from the additional fee in the
Pollution Control Account; and
(b) Make quarterly distributions of the money in the Pollution
Control Account attributable to each county whose board of county
commissioners imposed the additional fee. The distributions made
pursuant to this paragraph must be equal to the amount of money
collected on behalf of the county pursuant to the additional fee
imposed by the board of county commissioners of the county.
8. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall provide for the
creation of an advisory committee consisting of representatives of
state and local agencies involved in the control of emissions from
motor vehicles. The committee shall:
(a) Establish goals and objectives for the program for control of
emissions from motor vehicles;
(b) Identify areas where funding should be made available; and
(c) Review and make recommendations concerning regulations
adopted pursuant to NRS 445B.770.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)